North Dakota, session 69, SB2330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Human trafficking and exploitation prevention and awareness education.
1. The board of a school district and the governing board of a school operated by a tribal
government shall:
a. Adopt a policy regarding human trafficking and exploitation prevention and awareness
education for students and faculty. As used in this section, "human trafficking" includes
sex trafficking.
b. Require schoolwide education addressing human trafficking and exploitation prevention
and awareness for all students in grades six, ten, and twelve.
c. Offer to parents and legal guardians optional workshops or materials or both to support
the education of the child of the parent or legal guardian on personal safety and
grooming prevention.
2. The education under this section:
a. May be provided by a nonprofit organization specializing in outreach and education on
human trafficking and exploitation .
b. Must be developmentally appropriate, culturally sensitive, and use best practices.
c. Must be provided annually to students.
d. May include:
(1) Definitions and the nature of human trafficking and exploitation ;
(2) State laws regarding human trafficking and exploitation ;
(3) Facts and statistics regarding human trafficking and exploitation in the state and
across the United States;
(4) The victim profiling tactics of human traffickers ;
(5) The role of online computer activity and pornography;
(6) Methods to identify a potential victim and actions to take following identification of a
victim;
(7) Information regarding:

S. B. NO. 2330 - PAGE 2
(a) Force, fraud, and coercion;
(b) Grooming;
(c) The complexities of abuse, indoctrination, and manipulation;
(d) The traits of a human trafficking victim ;
(e) The difference between human trafficking and prostitution; and
(f) How human trafficking and exploitation demand is created and which
industries influence human trafficking and exploitation; and
(8) Actionable steps to take against human trafficking and exploitation, including
reporting information to the proper authorities.

S. B. NO. 2330 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2330.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 3 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State